Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1016
Game and Parks Commission; Game Law; sections, how construed.

Nothing in sections 28-1008 to 28-1017, 28-1019, and 28-1020 shall be construed as amending or changing the authority of the Game and Parks Commission as established in the Game Law or to prohibit any conduct authorized or permitted by such law.

Laws 1990, LB 50, § 9;

Laws 2003, LB 273, § 9;

Laws 2008, LB764, § 10;

Laws 2008, LB1055, § 7;

Laws 2009, LB494, § 5;

Laws 2015, LB360, § 9.

Game Law, see section 37-201.